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DI3RV-01

DTC P0715/67 | Input/Turbine Speed Sensor Circuit Malfunc-
tion (O/D Direct Clutch Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

O/D Direct Clutch Drum This sensor detects the rotation speed of the O/D input shaft
from the rotation of the O/D direct clutch drum.

Its construction is the same as that of the No.2 speed sensor
(See page DI-44).

By comparing the O/D direct clutch speed signal and No.2
8 speed sensor signal, the Engine and ECT ECU detects the shift
v O/D Direct Clutch timing ofthe gears and appropriately controls the engine torque
and hydraulic pressure inresponseto various conditions, thus

posora|  doing smooth gear shift.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

All conditions below are detected for 5 secs. or more
2-trip detectionlogic)

a) Gear change not being performed

b) Gear position: 1st, 2nd 3rd or O/D

(

E *Openorshortin O/D direct clutch speed sensor circuit
P0715/67 (c) T/Minputshaftrpm: 300 rpmorless

(

(

(

» O/D directclutch speed sensor
*Engineand ECTECU

d) T/M output shaft rpm: 1,000 rpm or more . L
; /M outpu P P * Automatic transmission assembly

e) Neutral start switch: OFF
f) No.1, No.2 solenoid valves and vehicle speed sensor are in
normal operation

Refertothe chartforthe wave form betweenterminals NCO
andNCO duringengineidling.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
In case of using the hand-held tester, start the inspection from step 1 and in case of not using the hand-held
tester, start from step 2.

1 Using hand-held tester, check O/D direct clutch speed signal.

PREPARATION:
(@ Remove the DLC3 cover.
(b) Connect a hand-held tester to the DLC3.
(c) Start the engine (Shift range: P).
(d) Turn the hand-held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read O/D direct clutch speed at engine idling.
OK:

750 = 50 rpm at engine idling

NG> Go to step 2.

Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in problem symptoms table (See page DI-22). However,
when DTC P0715/67 is displayed, check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).
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2 [ Check resistance between terminals NCO+ and NCO  of Engine and ECT ECU.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO-127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK: N B
Check resistance between terminals NCO and NCO of En-
gine and ECT ECU
OK:
D01656 Resistance: 560 - 680 Q at 20 °C (68 °F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN-35).

@

3 | Check O/D direct clutch speed sensor.

PREPARATION:

Remove the O/D direct clutch speed sensor from the transmis-

sion.

CHECK:

(@ Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of O/D di-
rect clutch speed sensor.

Magnet (b) Check voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of the speed
sensor when a magnet is put close to the front end of the
\ speed sensor then kept away quickly.
OK:
/ O (a): Voltage is generated intermittently
N (b): Resistance: 560 — 680 ©2 20 °C (68 °F)
. HINT:

bosorz| The generated voltage is extremely low.

NG> Replace the O/D direct clutch speed sensor.

Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween Engine and ECT ECU and O/D direct
clutch speed sensor (See page IN-35).
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